Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2660.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 602, 603, 604 and 605(c)(1) of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 602. Legislative intent.It is the intent of the General Assembly [that farmers be offered an incentive to use agricultural best management practices as part of an approved nutrient or odor management plan, manure management plan, agricultural erosion and sedimentation plan or Federal conservation plan to prevent nutrients from washing off farm fields and animal concentration areas and entering surface water and groundwater, to prevent soil erosion, to reduce or mitigate odor and to conserve land, water and related natural resources. These incentives shall take 12345678910111213141516171819 the form of low-interest capital in exchange for the implementation of such approved practices.] to:(1) Offer farmers access to affordable capital in order to encourage the adoption of conservation measures that improve soil health, water quality and odor mitigation.(2) Encourage a new generation of farmers.(3) Assist farmers with other capital needs.§ 603. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:["Agricultural erosion and sedimentation plan." An erosion and sedimentation plan established under The Clean Streams Law.]"Agricultural commodity." As defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Agricultural production." As defined in section 3 of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the Agricultural Area Security Law."Beginning farmer." A person that:(1) Has demonstrated experience in the agriculture industry or related field or has transferable skills as determined by the department.(2) H as not received Federal gross income from agricultural production for more than the 10 most recent taxable years.(3) Intends to engage in agricultural production or the production of an agricultural commodity within the borders of this Commonwealth and to provide the majority of the labor and management involved in that agricultural production.20260HB2660PN3695 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Best management practices." A practice or combination of practices determined by the commission to be effective and practicable, given technological, economic and institutional considerations, to manage and conserve land, water and related resources and to manage nutrients to protect surface water and groundwater, taking into account applicable nutrient requirements for crop utilization or to manage odors. [Best management practices shall include, but not be limited to:(1) Conservation tillage.(2) Crop rotation.(3) Soil testing.(4) Manure testing.(5) Diversions.(6) Manure storage facilities.(7) Storm water management practices.(8) Nutrient application.(9) Stream bank fencing.(10) Riparian buffers.(11) Pasture livestock watering systems where stream bank fencing is installed.(12) Odor barriers.(13) Development of a voluntary nutrient or odor management plan.(14) Manure management plans.(15) Agricultural erosion and sedimentation plans.(16) Federal conservation plans.]"Commission." The State Conservation Commission established by the Conservation District Law."Conservation District Law." The act of May 15, 1945 (P.L.547, No.217), known as the Conservation District Law.20260HB2660PN3695 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Eligible borrower." Any person, individual, partnership, corporation or legal entity who has an interest in property in this Commonwealth[, who engages in agricultural operation in this Commonwealth, who has legal and financial responsibility for the agricultural operation and who has developed an approved nutrient management plan under Chapter 5 (relating to nutrient management and odor management), a manure management plan or an agricultural erosion and sedimentation plan or other commission-approved Federal or State conservation program or approved best management practices.] and:(1) Is engaged in or intends to engage in agricultural production or the production of an agricultural commodity in this Commonwealth.(2) Has or will have legal and financial responsibility for the agricultural production."Lending institution." Any financial institution that is authorized to issue commercial loans, is a State depository approved by the Board of Finance and Revenue and enters into an agreement with the State Treasurer for participation in the Agriculture-Linked Investment Program. The term includes any agricultural credit association affiliated with the Farm Credit Bank, a federally chartered instrumentality pursuant to the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (Public Law 92-181, 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.), as amended, that enters into an agreement with the State Treasurer for participation in the Agriculture-Linked Investment Program.["Manure management plan." A manure management plan established under The Clean Streams Law."Nutrient management plan." A written site-specific nutrient plan approved by the commission or its delegated agent which 20260HB2660PN3695 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incorporates best management practices to manage the use of plant nutrients for crop production and water quality protection consistent with the criteria established under Chapter 5."Odor management plan." A written site-specific plan approved by the commission or its delegated agent which incorporates best management practices to reduce or mitigate odor consistent with the criteria established under Chapter 5."The Clean Streams Law." The act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law.]§ 604. General authority of commission.(a) Authority.--The commission shall retain and may utilize the authority established in the Conservation District Law and Chapter 5 (relating to nutrient management and odor management) as well as any other authority delegated or bestowed upon the commission in the administration of this chapter, including money appropriated, given, granted or donated to the commission for the purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate or abridge the authority of the commission under any other statute or grant of authority.[(b) Best management practices.--(1) The commission or the commission's delegated agent may review applications to approve the best management practice for which the applicant is seeking a loan under this chapter.(2) The commission may vote to expand the list of best management practices to assure new technological, environmental and scientific advances and discoveries. The commission may consider and make available practices established in statute or regulation to further the purposes 20260HB2660PN3695 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this chapter. Upon establishing a new best management practice, the commission shall submit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. A new best management practice shall take effect upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.](c) Lending priorities.--The commission or the commission's delegated agent may review applications to determine if the application aligns with lending priorities as approved by the commission.(d) Eligible projects.--(1) The commission shall vote at least once a year on the types of projects that it will prioritize for lending, with consideration given to capital improvements and expenditures related to agricultural production or the production of an agricultural commodity within the borders of this Commonwealth.(2) The commission may consult with the department in establishing criteria for eligible projects.(3) Eligible projects include:(i) Best management practices as determined by the commission.(ii) The purchases of farms by beginning farmers.(iii) Projects that help agricultural operations address agricultural nutrients or odor concerns or that produce energy from agricultural or animal by-products.(iv) Other lending priorities as established by the commission in consultation with the department.§ 605. Agriculture-Linked Investment Program.* * *(c) Terms of loan for borrowers.--The terms of the loans for 20260HB2660PN3695 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 borrowers shall be:(1) Loans shall not exceed [$250,000] $500,000.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2660PN3695 - 7 - 1234